California, session 20252026, SB1074.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 16850) is added to Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 2.6. Self-Preferencing Online Platforms16850. For purposes of this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(b) “Business user” means a person or entity that uses a covered platform for the purpose of connecting with consumers or other business users to provide products or services. services, including a person for whom a covered platform provides access to users or customers.(c) “Nonpublic business user data” means data generated by the activities of a business user on a covered platform that is not made publicly available by the covered platform to all similarly situated business users on equivalent terms.(d) “Consumer” means a natural person who uses a covered platform for purposes other than as a business user.(e) “Covered platform” means a digital interface that allows business users or sellers to connect with consumers or other business users in the state and that meets both of the following:(1) The platform, at any time in the last 24 months, had an average of 100,000,000 or more monthly active users in the United States.(2) The platform meets either of the following:(A) At any point prior to January 1, 2030, it is owned, controlled, or operated by an entity or person that in the last 24 months has had an average of one trillion dollars ($1,000,000,000,000) or greater in market capitalization.(B) At any point on or after January 1, 2030, it is owned, controlled, or operated by an entity or person that in the last 24 months has had an average of one trillion dollars ($1,000,000,000,000) or greater in market capitalization or private valuation.(f) “Covered provider” means a person or entity that owns, controls, or operates a covered platform.(g) “Most Favored Nation Clause” means a clause in a contract that gives a party to the contract the legal right to terms and benefits under the contract that are as good as or more favorable than the terms and benefits received by anyone else who enters into a similar contract with the other party.(h) “Self-preferencing conduct” means a practice by which a covered provider treats its own products, services, lines of business, or content more favorably than comparable products, services, or content of a business user, whether implemented through ranking, display, algorithmic recommendation, technical access conditions, integration depth, default status, or any other means of determining the relative visibility, accessibility, or prominence of products, services, or content on or through the covered platform.16851. (a) A covered provider shall not preference its own products, services, or lines of business over those of another business user on the covered platform engage in self-preferencing conduct. Prohibited self-preferencing conduct under this subdivision includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Manipulate Manipulating the order of search results or rankings to favor the products or services of the covered provider.(2) Exploit Exploiting transaction data or nonpublic proprietary data collected from a third-party seller to market or develop the products of the covered provider.(3) Employ Employing policies or practices that cause a business user to operate at an unreasonable cost disadvantage relative to the covered provider.(4) Favor Favoring a company on the platform based on the profit margin returned to the covered provider.(5) Condition Conditioning platform access or preferred status or placement on the covered platform on the purchase or use of other products or services offered by the covered provider, where a materially less restrictive means of achieving any legitimate integration objective is available.(6) Require Requiring most favored nation clauses or margin guarantees that restrict the ability of a business user to set their own prices.(7) Provide Providing an agent or third-party service financed in a manner that creates a conflict of interest between the user and the covered provider.(b) A covered provider shall not restrict the independence or interoperability of business users and consumers on the platform. Prohibited conduct under this subdivision includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Restrict, impede, or unreasonably delay a business user from interoperating with the same platform features, operating systems, or hardware available to the covered provider’s own lines of business.(2) Restrict a business user or consumer from obtaining a copy of their data in a useful and portable format.(3) Restrict a consumer from voluntarily providing data through a covered platform to a third party.(4) (A) Design, deploy, or utilize artificial intelligence in a manner that systematically favors the products, services, content, or commercial partners of the covered platform over those of third parties.(B) The use of artificial intelligence as described in subparagraph (A) includes a generative artificial intelligence summary, recommendation engine, conversational agent, or shopping assistant.(C) Subparagraph (A) shall not apply if the covered platform demonstrates that it consistently applies a neutral methodology to both its own and third-party content and that any differential treatment results solely from that neutral methodology and not from the commercial interests of the covered platform.16852. (a) In any action brought to enforce this chapter, it shall be an affirmative defense if the defendant establishes both of the following:(1) The alleged conduct was narrowly tailored, nonpretextual, and reasonably necessary to achieve a procompetitive purpose.(2) The procompetitive justifications and actual effects of the conduct clearly outweigh the competitive harms in the same market.(b) This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit a covered platform from displaying objective information that is susceptible to a singular result, including mathematical calculations, the current time, standard unit conversions, and publicly available, contemporaneous data feeds that are displayed without the exercise of editorial judgment, if both of the following conditions are met:(1) The display does not systematically displace a competitive market for the provision of that information.(2) The covered platform does not apply differential treatment to comparable information provided by a third party.16853. (a) An action to enforce this chapter may be brought by any person, entity, or public officer authorized to bring an action under the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700)).(b) A covered provider that violates this chapter shall be liable for the same penalties, damages, and fees as those provided in the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700)).16854. (a) The remedies and penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state, including, but not limited to, the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700)), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000)), and the Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200)).(b) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.